fr: Véhicules et accessoires > Pièces détachées pour véhicules > Pièces détachées et accessoires nautiques > Entrée au bassin et ancrage: Chaînes d’ancrage; Câbles d’ancrage; Guindeaux; Ancres; Gaffes; Échelles de bateau; Taquets d’amarrage; Marches de quai
nb: Kjøretøy og deler > Deler og tilbehør til kjøretøy > Båtdeler og -tilbehør > Legge til og ankre: Ankerkjeder; Ankerliner og -tau; Ankervinsjer; Ankre; Båtkroker; Båtstiger; Ankerfester; Bryggetrinn
da: Køretøjer og dele > Dele og tilbehør til køretøjer > Dele og tilbehør til fartøjer > Dokning og anker: Ankerkæder; Ankerliner og -reb; Ankerspil; Ankre; Bådkroge; Bådstiger; Dobbelte klamper; Trappetrin
fi: Ajoneuvot ja osat > Ajoneuvojen osat ja tarvikkeet > Veneen osat ja tarvikkeet > Kiinnitys ja ankkurointi: Ankkuriketjut; Ankkuriköydet; Ankkurivinssit; Ankkurit; Venekoukut; Venetikkaat; Laituripollarit; Laituriportaat
hr-HR: Vozila i dijelovi vozila > Dijelovi i oprema za vozila > Dijelovi i dodaci za plovila > Pristajanje i sidrenje: Sidreni lanci; Konopi i užad za sidrenje; Sidrena vitla; Sidra; Čaklje; Ljestve za čamac; Bitve; Stepenice za pristanište
hu: Járművek és alkatrészek > Járműalkatrészek és -kiegészítők > Vízijármű-alkatrészek és -kiegészítők > Dokkolás és horgonyzás: Horgonyláncok; Horgonyzsinórok és -kötelek; Horgonycsörlők; Horgonyok; Csónakhorgok; Csónaklétrák; Dokk-kapcsok; Dokklétrák
zh-TW: 車輛與零配件 > 車輛零件/配件 > 船艇零件/配件 > 停泊用零配件: 錨鏈; 錨繩; 錨機; 錨; 船鉤; 登船小梯; 繫纜樁; 登船梯
zh-CN: 交通工具/汽车/飞机/船舶 > 交通工具零件/配件 > 船艇零件/配件 > 停港装置: 锚链; 锚线/锚绳; 起锚机; 锚; 船钩; 船梯; 系缆墩/系绳栓; 码头台阶
it: Veicoli e parti > Componenti e accessori per auto > Parti e accessori imbarcazioni > Ponti e ancoraggi: Catene per ancore; Funi e corde per ancore; Verricelli per ancore; Ancore; Mezzomarinaio; Scalette per imbarcazioni; Gallocce per pontili; Scalini per pontili
pt-BR: Veículos e peças > Peças e acessórios de veículos > Peças e acessórios para embarcações > Doca e ancoragem: Correntes para âncora; Linhas e cordas para âncora; Molinetes de âncora; Âncoras; Gancho para barco; Escada para barco; Cunha para doca; Escadas para doca
en: Vehicles & Parts > Vehicle Parts & Accessories > Watercraft Parts & Accessories > Docking & Anchoring: Anchor Chains; Anchor Lines & Ropes; Anchor Windlasses; Anchors; Boat Hooks; Boat Ladders; Dock Cleats; Dock Steps
th: รถยนต์และชิ้นส่วน > ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์สำหรับยานยนต์ > ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์เรือ > การเทียบท่าและการทอดสมอ: สายของสมอ; สายสมอ; เครื่องกว้านสมอ; สมอ; ตะขอเรือ; บันไดเรือ; หลักผูกเชือกบนท่า; บันไดเทียบท่า
bg-BG: Превозни средства и части > Автомобилни части и аксесоари > Части и аксесоари за плавателни съдове > Акостиране и закотвяне: Котвени вериги; Котвени въжета; Брашпили; Котви; Куки за лодки; Стълби за лодки; Кнехтове; Стъпала за пристан
cs: Vozidla a náhradní díly > Díly a příslušenství vozidel > Díly a příslušenství k motorovým člunům > Uvazování a kotvení: Kotevní řetězy; Kotevní lana; Kotevní vrátky; Kotvy; Lodní háky; Lodní žebříky; Úvazníky; Schůdky
ro-RO: Vehicule și piese > Piese și accesorii pentru vehicule > Piese și accesorii pentru ambarcațiuni > Andocare și ancorare: Lanțuri ancoră; Odgoane și frânghii ancoră; Vinciuri de ancoră; Ancore; Cârlige pentru bărci; Scări pentru bărci; Cleme de andocare; Trepte doc
sk-SK: Diely pre vozidlá > Diely a príslušenstvo pre vozidlá > Diely a príslušenstvo pre plavidlá > Parkovanie v prístave a ukotvenie: Kotviace reťaze; Kotviace šnúry a laná; Kotviace navijaky; Kotvy; Lodné háky; Lodné rebríky; Dokovacie konzoly; Dokovacie schodíky
pl: Pojazdy i części > Akcesoria i części do pojazdów > Części i akcesoria do jednostek pływających > Dokowanie i kotwiczenie: Łańcuchy do kotwic; Liny do kotwic; Kabestany; Kotwice; Haki do łodzi; Drabiny do łodzi; Knagi; Trapy
sl-SI: Vozila in deli > Deli in dodatki za vozila > Deli in dodatki za vodna plovila > Privezovanje in sidranje: Verige za sidra; Kabli in vrvi za privezovanje; Sidrni vitli; Sidra; Kljuke za čolne; Lestve za plovila; Bitve; Stopnice za pomol
ko: 차량/부품 > 차량 부품/부대용품 > 선박 부품/부대용품 > 입거/계류: 닻줄; 앵커 라인/로프; 양묘기; 닻; 보트 후크; 보트 사다리; 밧줄걸이; 선창 디딤대
ru: Транспортные средства, запчасти и аксессуары > Запчасти и аксессуары для транспортных средств > Запчасти и аксессуары для водного транспорта > Швартовка и постановка на якорь: Якорные цепи; Якорные тросы и канаты; Брашпили; Якоря; Отпорные крюки; Судовые трапы; Швартовые утки; Причальные трапы
ja: 乗り物・パーツ > 乗り物用パーツ・関連用品 > 船舶パーツ・関連用品 > 係船用品: アンカーチェーン; アンカーロープ; アンカー巻き上げ機; アンカー; ボートフック; ボートラダー; 係船クリート; 乗船用ステップ
el: Οχήματα & ανταλλακτικά > Ανταλλακτικά & αξεσουάρ οχημάτων > Ανταλλακτικά & αξεσουάρ για σκάφη > Πρόσδεση & αγκυροβόληση: Αλυσίδες άγκυρας; Σχοινιά & σπάγκοι άγκυρας; Εργάτες άγκυρας; Άγκυρες; Άγκιστρα για βάρκες; Σκάλες για βάρκες; Κρίκοι δέστρας; Σκαλοπάτια δέστρας
pt-PT: Veículos e peças > Acessórios e peças para veículos > Acessórios e peças para embarcações > Atracagem e ancoragem: Correntes de âncoras; Cordas e linhas de âncoras; Guinchos para âncoras; Âncoras; Ganchos para barcos; Escadas para barcos; Cunhos para docas; Degraus para docas
vi: Xe và phụ tùng > Bộ phận và phụ kiện xe cộ > Bộ phận & linh kiện tàu thuyền > Neo đậu tàu thuyền: Xích neo; Dây neo; Tời neo; Neo tàu thuyền; Sào kéo thuyền; Thang tàu thuyền; Cọc neo tàu thuyền; Thang lên xuống
es: Vehículos y recambios > Piezas y accesorios para vehículos > Accesorios y piezas para embarcaciones > Atracada y anclaje: Cadenas para anclas; Cuerdas y sogas para anclas; Cabrestantes para anclas; Anclas; Bicheros; Escalas para barcos; Cornamusas; Escaleras para muelle
de: Fahrzeuge & Teile > Fahrzeugersatzteile & -zubehör > Wasserfahrzeugteile & Zubehör > Anlegen & Ankern: Ankerketten; Ankerleinen & -seile; Ankerwinden; Anker; Bootshaken; Bootsleitern; Klampen & Klemmen; Stufentritte
nl: Voertuigen en onderdelen > Voertuigonderdelen en -accessoires > Onderdelen en accessoirs voor vaartuigen > Aanleggen en voor anker gaan: Ankerkettingen; Ankerlijnen en -touwen; Ankerlieren; Ankers; Boothaken; Bootladders; Aanlegkikkers; Kadeladders
lt-LT: Transporto priemonės ir dalys > Transporto priemonių dalys ir priedai > Vandens transporto priemonių dalys ir priedai > Švartavimasis ir inkarai: Inkarų grandinės; Inkaro trosai ir lynai; Inkarų suktuvai; Inkarai; Valčių kabliai; Valčių kopėčios; Švartavimo stulpeliai; Prieplaukų laipteliai
sv: Fordon och delar > Fordonsdelar och tillbehör > Delar och tillbehör till fartyg > Dockning och ankring: Ankarkedjor; Ankarlinor och -rep; Ankarspel; Ankare; Båtkrokar; Båtstegar; Knapar; Dockningssteg
tr: Taşıtlar ve Parçalar > Taşıt Parçaları ve Aksesuarlar > Su Jetli Tekne Parçaları ve Aksesuarları > Havuzlama ve Demir Atma: Çapa Zincirleri; Çapa Kablosu ve İpleri; Çapa Çıkrıkları; Çapalar; Tekne Kancaları; Tekne Merdivenleri; Havuz Demirleri; Havuzlama Basamakları